Texas statutes.
GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 3. LEGISLATIVE BRANCH

SUBTITLE C. LEGISLATIVE AGENCIES AND OVERSIGHT COMMITTEES

CHAPTER 329. COMMISSION ON UNIFORM STATE LAWS

Sec. 329.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Commission" means the Commission on Uniform State Laws.

(2) "National conference" means the National Conference of Commissioners on Uniform State Laws.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 38, Sec. 1, eff. Sept 1, 1991.

Transferred, redesignated and amended from Government Code, Chapter 762 by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1042 (H.B. 4294), Sec. 4, eff. June 18, 2021.

Sec. 329.002. DUTIES OF COMMISSION. (a) The commission shall:

(1) promote the uniform judicial interpretation of all uniform laws; and

(2) before January 1 of each odd-numbered year, submit a biennial report to the legislature that contains an account of the commission's transactions and its advice and recommendations for legislation.

(b) The commission may supplement the report.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 38, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Transferred, redesignated and amended from Government Code, Chapter 762 by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1042 (H.B. 4294), Sec. 4, eff. June 18, 2021.

Sec. 329.003. COMPOSITION OF COMMISSION; TERMS. (a) The commission is composed of:

(1) nine members appointed by the governor;

(2) two members appointed by the lieutenant governor, who are members or officers of the senate;

(3) two members appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives, who are members or officers of the house of representatives;

(4) the chair of the standing committee of the senate with primary jurisdiction over uniform state laws;

(5) the chair of the standing committee of the house of representatives with primary jurisdiction over uniform state laws;

(6) the executive director of the Texas Legislative Council or a person designated by the executive director; and

(7) in addition to the persons described by Subdivisions (1) through (6), residents of this state who have long service in the cause of uniformity in state legislation as shown by:

(A) at least 20 years of service representing the state as an associate member of the national conference;

(B) election as a life member of the national conference; or

(C) at least 15 years of service as a member of the commission and at least five years of combined service as a judge or justice of a trial or appellate court of this state.

(b) Appointments to the commission shall be made without regard to the race, creed, sex, religion, or national origin of the appointees.

(c) Members appointed by the governor under Subsection (a)(1) serve staggered six-year terms, with the terms of three members expiring September 30 of each even-numbered year.

(d) Members appointed by the lieutenant governor under Subsection (a)(2) serve at the pleasure of the lieutenant governor.

(e) Members appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives under Subsection (a)(3) serve at the pleasure of the speaker.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 38, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 170 (H.B. 510), Sec. 1, eff. May 21, 1999; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 30 (H.B. 808), Sec. 1, eff. July 1, 2001.

Transferred, redesignated and amended from Government Code, Chapter 762 by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1042 (H.B. 4294), Sec. 4, eff. June 18, 2021.

Sec. 329.004. ELIGIBILITY; LOBBYIST RESTRICTION. (a) To be eligible for appointment to or service on the commission, a person must be an attorney licensed to practice law.

(b) At least one of the commissioners, at the time of that commissioner's appointment, must be a state judge.

(c) At least one of the commissioners, at the time of that commissioner's appointment, must be a legal educator.

(d) A person required to register as a lobbyist under Chapter 305 because of the person's activities for compensation in or on behalf of a profession related to the operation of the commission may not serve as a commissioner or act as general counsel to the commission.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 38, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Transferred, redesignated and amended from Government Code, Chapter 762 by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1042 (H.B. 4294), Sec. 4, eff. June 18, 2021.

Sec. 329.005. DUTIES OF COMMISSIONERS. Each commissioner shall:

(1) promote uniformity in state laws in subject areas in which uniformity is desirable and practicable; and

(2) attend national conference meetings.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 38, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Transferred, redesignated and amended from Government Code, Chapter 762 by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1042 (H.B. 4294), Sec. 4, eff. June 18, 2021.

Sec. 329.006. VACANCY; EXPIRATION OF TERM. (a) This section applies only to a commissioner appointed by the governor.

(b) The office of an appointed commissioner becomes vacant on the death, resignation, failure or refusal to serve, or removal of the commissioner.

(c) The governor shall fill a vacancy by appointing a person to the commission for the unexpired term of the commissioner vacating the office.

(d) On the vacancy or expiration of the term of office of an appointed commissioner, the governor shall appoint a state judge or legal educator if the appointment is required by Section 329.004(b) or (c).

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 38, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Transferred, redesignated and amended from Government Code, Chapter 762 by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1042 (H.B. 4294), Sec. 4, eff. June 18, 2021.

Sec. 329.007. GROUNDS FOR REMOVAL. (a) It is a ground for removal from the commission if a member:

(1) did not have, at the time of appointment or election, the qualifications required by Section 329.004;

(2) does not maintain the qualifications required by Section 329.004;

(3) is prohibited from serving as a commissioner under Section 329.004(d); or

(4) is ineligible to participate in activities of the national conference.

(b) The validity of an action of the commission is not affected because it is taken when a member is subject to removal.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 38, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Transferred, redesignated and amended from Government Code, Chapter 762 by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1042 (H.B. 4294), Sec. 4, eff. June 18, 2021.

Sec. 329.008. MEETING AND ELECTION OF OFFICERS. (a) The commission shall meet at least once every two years.

(b) The commissioners shall elect a chair and secretary, who shall each hold office for a term of two years.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 38, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Transferred, redesignated and amended from Government Code, Chapter 762 by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1042 (H.B. 4294), Sec. 4, eff. June 18, 2021.

Sec. 329.009. COMPENSATION. A commissioner serves without compensation but is entitled to be reimbursed for reasonable expenses incurred in the performance of the commissioner's duties.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 38, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Transferred, redesignated and amended from Government Code, Chapter 762 by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1042 (H.B. 4294), Sec. 4, eff. June 18, 2021.

Sec. 329.010. SUPPORT SERVICES. The Texas Legislative Council shall provide accounting, clerical, and other support services necessary for the commission to carry out its duties.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 38, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Transferred, redesignated and amended from Government Code, Chapter 762 by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1042 (H.B. 4294), Sec. 4, eff. June 18, 2021.